Maine, session 132, LD50.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 5 MRSA §12025 is enacted to read:
§12025. Municipal right of first refusal upon sale of real property
1. Right of first refusal. A municipality has a right of first refusal to purchase real
property that is owned by a quasi-independent state entity and is located within the
boundaries of the municipality at the current market value of the real property as
determined by an independent appraiser pursuant to subsection 2.
2. Appraisal; notification of right. Before selling, negotiating the sale of or offering
for sale real property in the State that is located within the boundaries of a municipality, a
quasi-independent state entity shall have the current market value of the real property
determined by an independent appraiser and shall notify in writing the municipal officers
of the municipality in which the real property is located of the municipality's right of first
refusal, the deadlines under subsection 3 for exercising the right and the current market
value of the real property as determined by the independent appraiser.
3. Expiration of right. A municipality's right of first refusal under subsection 1
expires if:
A. The municipality fails to send a written notice to the quasi-independent state entity
invoking the right of first refusal within 30 days of the date that the municipality
received a written notice that complies with the requirements of subsection 2; or
B. Unless the failure is caused by the quasi-independent state entity, the municipality
fails to complete the purchase of the real property within 3 months of the date that the
municipality sent a timely written notice to the quasi-independent state entity invoking
the right of first refusal.